Utah statutes.
39-6-73.   Unlawful enlistment, appointment, or separation of another.
A person subject to this chapter who effects an enlistment or appointment in,
or a separation from, the National Guard of any person when he knows that the
enlistment, appointment, or separation is prohibited by law, regulation, or
order, shall be punished as a military court may direct.
